Oklahoma, session 2025, SB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 593 of Title 21, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It shall be unlawful for any state entity or political


subdivision of this state, or any branch, division, foundation,


contractor, or affiliate of a political subdivision of this state,


to expend any monies, funds, or resources, directly or indirectly,


for:


1. Publicity or propaganda purposes opposing rights as stated


in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States;



Req. No. 885 Page 1


2. Preparation, distribution, or use of any kit, pamphlet,


booklet, publication, electronic communication, radio, television or


video presentation, or other audiovisual presentation or material


designed to defeat the enactment of:


a. legislation before any federal or state governmental


entity relating to rights as stated in the Second


Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, or


b. any proposed or pending rule, regulation,


administrative action, or order issued by any federal


or state governmental entity relating to rights as


stated in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of


the United States; or


3. Employment, retention, or use of an executive or legislative


lobbyist or legislative liaison, as such terms are defined in the


Rules of the Ethics Commission, to support or defeat the enactment,


repeal, or amendment of any legislation, rule, regulation,


administrative action, or order by any federal or state governmental


entity in opposition to rights as stated in the Second Amendment to


the Constitution of the United States.


B. No individual, state entity, or political subdivision of


this state, or any branch, division, foundation, contractor, or


affiliate of a political subdivision of this state, shall use any


monies, funds, or resources, directly or indirectly, to pay the


salary or expenses of any public employee or grant or contract

Req. No. 885 Page 2


recipient, or agent acting on behalf of such recipient, related to


any activity designed to influence the enactment, repeal, or


amendment of legislation, an appropriation, a regulation, an


administrative action, a rule, or an executive order proposed or


pending before any federal or state governmental entity in


opposition to rights as stated in the Second Amendment to the


Constitution of the United States.


C. The use of public property, resources, employees, networks,


or time shall be considered to be the use of funds pursuant to the


provisions of this section.


D. The prohibitions in subsections A and B of this section


shall include any activity to advocate or promote any proposed,


pending, or future:


1. Federal or state tax, fine, or fee increase relating to


rights as stated in the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the


United States; or


2. Requirement or restriction on any legal consumer product,


including its sale or marketing, relating to rights as stated in the


Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.


E. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,


upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in the county jail


for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.

Req. No. 885 Page 3


F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:


1. Any person elected to a state, county, or municipal office


or any person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in a state, county,


or municipal office;


2. Any person presenting neutral testimony on behalf of an


organization; or


3. Any person stating a personal opinion while presenting


testimony and the person is not testifying in his or her official


capacity.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-885 CN 1/19/2025 5:40:28 AM

























Req. No. 885 Page 4